Illinois, session 104th, SB2113.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Public Higher Education Act is amended by 5adding Section 18 as follows: 6    (110 ILCS 167/18 new)7    Sec. 18. Voting incentives prohibited. The governing board 8of each public institution of higher education shall adopt a 9policy that prohibits employees of the public institution of 10higher education from offering incentives to students to vote.